Illinois, session 104th, SB1597.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Renewable Energy Facilities Agricultural 5Impact Mitigation Act is amended by changing Section 15 as 6follows: 7    (505 ILCS 147/15)8    Sec. 15. Agricultural impact mitigation agreement. 9    (a) A commercial renewable energy facility owner of a 10commercial wind energy facility or a commercial solar energy 11facility that is located on landowner property shall enter 12into an agricultural impact mitigation agreement with the 13Department outlining construction and deconstruction standards 14and policies designed to preserve the integrity of any 15agricultural land that is impacted by commercial renewable 16energy facility construction and deconstruction. The 17construction and deconstruction of any commercial solar energy 18facility shall be in conformance with the Department's 19standard agricultural impact mitigation agreement referenced 20in subsection (f) of this Section. Except as provided in 21subsection (a-5) of this Section, the terms and conditions of 22the Department's standard agricultural impact mitigation 23agreement are subject to and may be modified by an underlying   SB1597- 2 -LRB104 05980 BDA 16013 b1agreement between the landowner and the commercial solar 2energy facility owner. 3    (a-5) Prior to the commencement of construction, a 4commercial solar energy facility owner shall submit to the 5county in which the commercial solar facility is to be located 6a deconstruction plan. A commercial solar energy facility 7owner shall provide the county with an appropriate financial 8assurance mechanism consistent with the Department's standard 9agricultural impact mitigation agreement for and to assure 10deconstruction in the event of an abandonment of a commercial 11solar energy facility. 12    (b) The agricultural impact mitigation agreement for a 13commercial wind energy facility shall include, but is not 14limited to, such items as restoration of agricultural land 15affected by construction, deconstruction (including upon 16abandonment of a commercial wind energy facility), 17construction staging, and storage areas; support structures; 18aboveground facilities; guy wires and anchors; underground 19cabling depth; topsoil replacement; protection and repair of 20agricultural drainage tiles; rock removal; repair of 21compaction and rutting; land leveling; prevention of soil 22erosion; repair of damaged soil conservation practices; 23prevention and remediation of soil and water contamination 24from the release of oil, lubricant, hydraulic fluid, 25transformer solvent, insulation fluid, cleaning fluid, or any 26other similar fluid; compensation for damages to private   SB1597- 3 -LRB104 05980 BDA 16013 b1property; clearing of trees and brush; interference with 2irrigation systems; access roads; weed control; pumping of 3water from open excavations; advance notice of access to 4private property; indemnification of landowners; and 5deconstruction plans and financial assurance for 6deconstruction (including upon abandonment of a commercial 7wind energy facility). 8    (b-5) The agricultural impact mitigation agreement for a 9commercial solar energy facility shall include, but is not 10limited to, such items as restoration of agricultural land 11affected by construction, deconstruction (including upon 12abandonment of a commercial solar energy facility); support 13structures; aboveground facilities; guy wires and anchors; 14underground cabling depth; topsoil removal and replacement; 15rerouting and permanent repair of agricultural drainage tiles; 16rock removal; repair of compaction and rutting; construction 17during wet weather; land leveling; prevention of soil erosion; 18repair of damaged soil conservation practices; compensation 19for damages to private property; clearing of trees and brush; 20access roads; weed control; advance notice of access to 21private property; indemnification of landowners; and 22deconstruction plans and financial assurance for 23deconstruction (including upon abandonment of a commercial 24solar energy facility). The commercial solar energy facility 25owner shall enter into one agricultural impact mitigation 26agreement for each commercial solar energy facility.   SB1597- 4 -LRB104 05980 BDA 16013 b1    (c) For commercial wind energy facility owners seeking a 2permit from a county or municipality for the construction of a 3commercial wind energy facility, the agricultural impact 4mitigation agreement shall be entered into prior to the public 5hearing required prior to a siting decision of a county or 6municipality regarding the commercial wind energy facility. 7The agricultural impact mitigation agreement is binding on any 8subsequent commercial wind energy facility owner that takes 9ownership of the commercial wind energy facility that is the 10subject of the agreement. 11    (c-5) A commercial solar energy facility owner shall, not 12less than 45 days prior to commencement of actual 13construction, submit to the Department a standard agricultural 14impact mitigation agreement as referenced in subsection (f) of 15this Section signed by the commercial solar energy facility 16owner and including all information required by the 17Department. The commercial solar energy facility owner shall 18provide either a copy of that submitted agreement or a copy of 19the fully executed project-specific agricultural impact 20mitigation agreement to the landowner not less than 30 days 21prior to the commencement of construction. The agricultural 22impact mitigation agreement is binding on any subsequent 23commercial solar energy facility owner that takes ownership of 24the commercial solar energy facility that is the subject of 25the agreement. 26    (d) If a commercial renewable energy facility owner seeks   SB1597- 5 -LRB104 05980 BDA 16013 b1an extension of a permit granted by a county or municipality 2for the construction of a commercial wind energy facility 3prior to the effective date of this Act, the agricultural 4impact mitigation agreement shall be entered into prior to a 5decision by the county or municipality to grant the permit 6extension. 7    (e) The Department may adopt rules that are necessary and 8appropriate for the implementation and administration of 9agricultural impact mitigation agreements as required under 10this Act. 11    (f) The Department shall make available on its website a 12standard agricultural impact mitigation agreement applicable 13to all commercial solar energy facilities within 60 days after 14the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 100th General 15Assembly. 16    (g) Nothing in this amendatory Act of the 100th General 17Assembly and nothing in an agricultural impact mitigation 18agreement shall be construed to apply to or otherwise impair 19an underlying agreement for a commercial solar energy facility 20entered into prior to the effective date of this amendatory 21Act of the 100th General Assembly. 22(Source: P.A. 99-132, eff. 7-24-15; 100-598, eff. 6-29-18.)